Utah statutes.
58-37c-19.   Possession or sale of crystal iodine.

(1)  Any person licensed to engage in a regulated transaction is guilty of a class B misdemeanor who, under circumstances not amounting to a violation of Subsection 58-37d-4(1)(c), offers to sell, sells, or distributes more than two ounces of crystal iodine to another person who is:

(a)  not licensed as a regulated purchaser of crystal iodine;

(b)  not excepted from licensure; or

(c)  not excepted under Subsection (3).

(2)  Any person who is not licensed to engage in regulated transactions and not excepted from licensure is guilty of a class A misdemeanor who, under circumstances not amounting to a violation of Subsection 58-37c-3(12)(k) or Subsection 58-37d-4(1)(a):

(a)  possesses more than two ounces of crystal iodine; or

(b)  offers to sell, sells, or distributes crystal iodine to another.

(3)  Subsection (2)(a) does not apply to:

(a)  a chemistry laboratory maintained by:

(i)  a public or private regularly established secondary school; or

(ii)  a public or private institution of higher education that is accredited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education;

(b)  a veterinarian licensed to practice under Title 58, Chapter 28, Veterinary Practice Act; or

(c)  a general acute hospital.

